Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 3 Long-term Care Ombudsman Program

Cross references.

Protective services for abused, neglected, or exploited disabled adults, T. 30, C. 5.

Further provisions regarding reporting of abuse or exploitation of residents of long-term care facilities, §

31-8-80

et seq.

Public assistance for the elderly generally, §

49-4-30

et seq.

Law reviews.

For note on 1995 amendments of Code sections in this article, see 12 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 241 (1995).

31-8-50.
Declaration of policy.

The General Assembly finds that a significant number of older citizens of this state reside in long-term care facilities in this state and, because of their isolated and vulnerable condition, are more dependent on others for their protection and care. It is the intent of the General Assembly to protect and improve the quality of care and life for residents through the promotion of community involvement in long-term care facilities and by the establishment of a process to resolve complaints and problems of residents. It is the further intent of the General Assembly that the department, within available resources and pursuant to its duties under the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, ensure that the quality of care and life for such residents is maintained, that necessary reports are made and that, where necessary, corrective action is taken at the departmental level.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1902a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 3001

et seq.

31-8-51.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Community ombudsman” means a person certified as a community ombudsman pursuant to Code Section 31-8-52.

(1.1)

“Department” means the Department of Human Services.

“Long-term care facility” means any skilled nursing home, intermediate care home, private home care provider, assisted living community, or personal care home now or hereafter subject to regulation and licensure by the Department of Community Health.

“Resident” means any person who is receiving treatment or care in any long-term care facility who seeks admission to such facility or who has been discharged or transferred from such facility.

“State ombudsman” means the state ombudsman established under Code Section 31-8-52.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1901a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-16/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 18/SB 178; Ga. L. 2014, p. 477, § 1/SB 207.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “Department of Community Health” was substituted for “department” in paragraph (2).

31-8-52.
Establishment of long-term care ombudsman program.

Pursuant to the Older Americans Act of 1965 (P.L. 89-73, 79 Stat. 219), as amended, and as a condition of receiving funds under that act for various programs for older citizens of this state, the Department of Human Services has been required to establish and operate a long-term care ombudsman program. In order to receive such funds, the department has already established a position of state ombudsman within the state Office of Special Programs. The state ombudsman shall be under the direct supervision of the commissioner of human services or his or her designee and shall be given the powers and duties hereafter provided by this article. The state ombudsman shall be a person qualified by training and experience in the field of aging or long-term care, or both. The state ombudsman shall promote the well-being and quality of life of residents in long-term care facilities and encourage the development of community ombudsman activities at the local level. The state ombudsman may certify community ombudsmen and such certified ombudsmen shall have the powers and duties set forth in Code Sections 31-8-54 and 31-8-55. The state ombudsman shall require such community ombudsmen to receive appropriate training as determined and approved by the department prior to certification. Such training shall include an internship of at least seven working days in a nursing home and at least three working days in a personal care home. Upon certification, the state ombudsman shall issue an identification card which shall be presented upon request by community ombudsmen whenever needed to carry out the purposes of this article. Two years after first being certified and every two years thereafter, each such community ombudsman, in order to carry out his or her duties under this article, shall be recertified by the state ombudsman as continuing to meet the department’s standards as community ombudsman.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1903a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1239, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-13/HB 214.

U.S. Code.

The Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 3001

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-8-53.
Duties of state ombudsman.

The state ombudsman shall:

Establish policies and procedures, subject to approval by the commissioner of human services, for receiving, investigating, referring, and attempting to resolve complaints made by or on behalf of residents of long-term care facilities concerning any act, omission to act, practice, policy, or procedure that may adversely affect the health, safety, or welfare of any resident;

Investigate and make reports and recommendations to the department and other appropriate agencies concerning any act or failure to act by any government agency with respect to its responsibilities and duties in connection with long-term care or residents of long-term care facilities;

Establish a uniform state-wide reporting system to record data about complaints and conditions in long-term care facilities and shall collect and analyze such data in order to identify significant problems affecting the residents of such facilities;

Promote the development of community ombudsmen activities and provide technical assistance as necessary; and

Make an annual written report, documenting the types of complaints and problems reported by residents, to the director of the Office of Special Programs for his recommendations to the commissioner concerning needed policy and regulatory and legislative changes.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1904a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-4/HB 228.

31-8-54.
Duties of community ombudsmen.

Pursuant to policies and procedures established by the state ombudsman, the community ombudsmen shall:

Learn about the general conditions affecting residents of long-term care facilities and work for the best interest of these residents;

Receive, investigate, and attempt to resolve complaints made by or on behalf of residents of long-term care facilities;

Collect data about the number and types of complaints handled; and

Report regularly to the state ombudsman about the data collected and the activities of the community ombudsmen.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1905a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1.

31-8-55.
Entry and investigative authority; cooperation of government agencies; communication with residents.

The state ombudsman or community ombudsman, on his or her initiative or in response to complaints made by or on behalf of residents of long-term care facilities, may conduct investigations in matters within his or her powers and duties as provided by this article.

The state ombudsman or community ombudsman shall have the authority to enter any long-term care facility and shall use his or her best efforts to enter such facility during normal visiting hours. Upon entering the long-term care facility, the ombudsman shall notify the administrator or, in the absence of the administrator, the person in charge of the facility, before speaking to any residents. After notifying the administrator or the person in charge of the facility, the ombudsman may communicate privately and confidentially with residents of the facility, individually or in groups. The ombudsman shall have access to the medical and social records of any resident if:

The ombudsman has the permission of the resident or the legal representative or guardian of the resident;

The resident is unable to consent to the review and has no legal representative or guardian; or

There is a guardian of the person of the resident and that guardian refuses to permit access to the records necessary to investigate a complaint, and:

There is reasonable cause to believe that the guardian is not acting in the best interests of the resident; and

A community ombudsman obtains the approval of the state ombudsman.

As used in this Code section, the term “legal representative” means an agent under a valid power of attorney, provided that the agent is acting within the scope of his or her agency; an agent under a durable power of attorney for health care or health care agent under an advance directive for health care; a mental health care agent under a psychiatric advance directive; or an executor, executrix, administrator, or administratrix of the estate of a deceased resident. The ombudsman shall have the authority to inspect the physical plant and have access to the administrative records, policies, and documents of the facility to which the residents have or the general public has access. Entry and investigation provided by this Code section shall be conducted in a manner which will not significantly disrupt the provision of nursing or other care to residents.

The state ombudsman or community ombudsman shall identify himself or herself as such to the resident, and the resident shall have the right to communicate or refuse to communicate with the ombudsman.

The resident shall have the right to participate in planning any course of action to be taken on his or her behalf by the state ombudsman or community ombudsman, and the resident shall have the right to approve or disapprove any proposed action to be taken on his or her behalf by such ombudsman.

The state ombudsman and community ombudsman shall have authority to obtain from any government agency, and such agency shall provide, such cooperation and assistance, services, data, and access to files and records as will enable the ombudsman properly to perform his or her duties and exercise his or her powers, provided such information is not privileged under any law.

Where the subject of the investigation involves suspected abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a resident by his or her guardian, the state ombudsman or community ombudsman shall have the authority to communicate with the resident in a private and confidential setting notwithstanding any objection by the guardian to such meeting and communication.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1906a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1239, § 1.1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 11/HB 24; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-9/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “a mental health care agent under a psychiatric advance directive;” in the first sentence in the undesignated last paragraph of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 1/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly has long recognized the right of the individual to control all aspects of his or her personal care and medical treatment, including the right to insist upon medical treatment, decline medical treatment, or direct that medical treatment be withdrawn.
In order to secure these rights, the General Assembly has adopted and amended statutes recognizing the living will and health care agency and provided statutory forms for both documents.

“(b) The General Assembly has determined that the statutory forms for the living will and durable power of attorney for health care are confusing and inconsistent and that the statutes providing for the living will and health care agency contain conflicting concepts, inconsistent and out-of-date terminology, and confusing and inconsistent requirements for execution. In addition, there is a commendable trend among the states to combine the concepts of the living will and health care agency into a single legal document.

“(c) The General Assembly recognizes that a significant number of individuals representing the academic, medical, legislative, and legal communities, state officials, ethics scholars, and advocacy groups worked together to develop the advance directive for health care contained in this Act, and the collective intent was to create a form that uses understandable and everyday language in order to encourage more citizens of this state to execute advance directives for health care.

“(d) The General Assembly finds that the clear expression of an individual’s decisions regarding health care, whether made by the individual or an agent appointed by the individual, is of critical importance not only to citizens but also to the health care and legal communities, third parties, and families. In furtherance of these purposes, the General Assembly enacts a new Chapter 32 of Title 31, setting forth general principles governing the expression of decisions regarding health care and the appointment of a health care agent, as well as a form of advance directive for health care.”

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

31-8-56.
Resolution of complaints.

Following an investigation, the state ombudsman or community ombudsman shall report his opinions or recommendations to the party or parties affected thereby and shall attempt to resolve the complaint using, whenever possible, informal techniques of mediation, conciliation, and persuasion. With respect to a complaint against the long-term care facility, the ombudsman shall first notify the administrator of the facility in writing and give such administrator a reasonable opportunity to correct any alleged defect. If the administrator fails to take corrective action after a reasonable amount of time or if the defect seriously threatens the safety or well-being of the residents, the state ombudsman or community ombudsman may refer the complaint to an appropriate agency.

Complaints or conditions adversely affecting residents of long-term care facilities which cannot be resolved in the manner described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall, whenever possible, be referred by the state ombudsman or community ombudsman to an appropriate agency.

The community ombudsman shall not disclose to the public, either directly or indirectly, the identity of any long-term care facility which is the subject of an investigation unless and until the matter has been reviewed by the office of the state ombudsman and the matter has been referred to an appropriate governmental agency for action.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1907a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1.

31-8-57.
Reporting abuse.

Any person who has reasonable cause to believe that a resident of a long-term care facility is being, or has been, abused, neglected, exploited, or abandoned or is in a condition which is the result of abuse, neglect, exploitation, or abandonment may report such information or cause a report to be made in any reasonable manner to the state ombudsman or community ombudsman, if any.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1909a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1.

31-8-58.
Confidentiality.

The identity of any complainant, resident on whose behalf a complaint is made, or individual providing information on behalf of the resident or complainant relevant to the investigation of a complaint shall be confidential and may be disclosed only with the express permission of such person. The information produced by an investigation may be disclosed by the state ombudsman or community ombudsman only if the identity of any such person is not disclosed by name or inference. If the identity of any such person is disclosed by name or inference in such information, the information may be disclosed only with his express permission. If the complaint becomes the subject of a judicial proceeding, such investigative information may be disclosed for the purpose of the proceeding.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1908a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1.

31-8-59.
Notice to residents.

The state ombudsman shall prepare and distribute to each long-term care facility in the state a written notice describing the long-term care ombudsman program and the procedure to follow in making a complaint, including the address and telephone number of the state ombudsman and community ombudsman, if any. The administrator shall give the written notice required by this Code section to each resident and his legally appointed guardian, if any, upon admission. The administrator shall also post such written notice in conspicuous public places in the facility in accordance with procedures provided by the state ombudsman and shall give such notice to any resident and his legally appointed guardian, if any, who did not receive it upon admission. The failure to provide the notices required by this Code section shall be a ground upon which the department may revoke any permit issued to a long-term care facility under Code Section 31-7-1.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1910a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Long-term care facilities: residents’ bill of rights, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Subject 111-8-50.

31-8-60.
Retaliation against resident and interference with ombudsman prohibited; provisions applicable to violations.

No person shall discriminate or retaliate in any manner against any resident or relative or guardian of a resident, any employee of a long-term care facility, or any other person because of the making of a complaint or providing of information in good faith to the state ombudsman or community ombudsman. No person shall willfully interfere with the state ombudsman or community ombudsman in the performance of his or her official duties. Code Sections 31-2-8 and 31-5-8 shall apply fully to any violation of this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1911a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1239, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-9/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-7/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-8-61.
Liability for provision of information.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person providing information, including, but not limited to, patient records, to the state ombudsman or a community ombudsman shall be held, by reason of having provided such information, to have violated any criminal law or to be civilly liable under any law unless such information is false and the person providing such information knew or had reason to believe that it was false.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1913a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1.

31-8-62.
Liability arising from complaints.

Any person who, in good faith, makes a complaint or provides information as authorized in this article shall incur no civil or criminal liability therefor. Any state or community ombudsman who, in good faith, performs his or her official duties, including but not limited to, making a statement or communication relevant to a complaint received or an investigative activity conducted pursuant to this article shall incur no civil or criminal liability therefor.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1912a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1239, § 3.

31-8-63.
Rules and regulations.

The department is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1914a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1240, § 1.